Washington statutes.
RCW 9.95.0001

Definitions.

(1) "Board" means the indeterminate sentence review board.

(2) "Community custody" means that portion of an offender's sentence subject to controls including crime-related prohibitions and affirmative conditions from the court, the board, or the department of corrections based on risk to community safety, that is served under supervision in the community, and which may be modified or revoked for violations of release conditions.

(3) "Crime-related prohibition" has the meaning defined in RCW 9.94A.030.

(4) "Department" means the department of corrections.

(5) "Parole" means that portion of a person's sentence for a crime committed before July 1, 1984, served on conditional release in the community subject to board controls and revocation and under supervision of the department.

(6) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of corrections or his or her designee.

[ 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 317.]

NOTES:

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12: See notes following RCW 71.09.250.

Application—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 ss 301-363: See note following RCW 9.94A.030.